Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.270

Penalty for violations.

Any officer or employee violating, or wilfully refusing or failing to comply with, any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 83 s 3.]